Nevada, session 83, SB183.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 432.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432.020 1. An agency which provides child welfare services
shall:
[1.] (a) Provide, to the extent that support is not otherwise
required by court order or pursuant to specific statute, maintenance
and special services to:
[(a)] (1) Unmarried mothers and children awaiting adoptive
placement.
[(b)] (2) Children who are placed in the custody of the agency
which provides child welfare services, and who are placed in foster
homes, homes of relatives other than parents or other facilities or
institutions. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute, if any
child is to be placed in the custody of the agency which provides
child welfare services, pursuant to any order of a court or request
made by a person or agency other than the agency which provides
child welfare services, this order or request may be issued or made
only after an opportunity for a hearing has been given to the agency
which provides child welfare services after 3 days’ notice, or upon
request of the agency which provides child welfare services.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
[2.] (b) Except as otherwise provided by court order or specific
statute, return a child to his or her natural home or the home of a
competent relative for a probationary period any time after the
expiration of 60 days after the placement of the child in the custody
of the agency which provides child welfare services, with
notification to but without formal application to a court, but the
agency which provides child welfare services retains the right to
custody of the child during the probationary period, until a court of
competent jurisdiction determines proper custody of the child.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an agency
which provides child welfare services shall not assign more than
30 children who are in the custody of the agency which provides
child welfare services to a caseworker who provides permanency
services.
3. An agency which provides child welfare services may
assign more than 30 children who are in the custody of the agency
which provides child welfare services to a caseworker who
provides permanency services:
(a) To allow siblings who are in the custody of the same
agency to be assigned to the same caseworker; or
(b) In accordance with a policy adopted by the agency that
authorizes the assignment of more than 30 children who are in the
custody of the agency to a caseworker for not longer than 30 days
in emergency circumstances.
4. The provisions of subsection 2 must not be construed to
apply to the assignment to a caseworker of a child who is not in
the custody of the agency which provides child welfare services,
including, without limitation, a child who is the subject of an
investigation by an agency which provides child welfare services to
determine whether the child is or may be in need of protection.
5. As used in this section, “permanency services” means
efforts made to ensure the safety and well-being of a child who is
in the custody of the agency which provides child welfare services.
The term includes, without limitation:
(a) Assessing and responding to the medical, mental health,
developmental and educational needs of the child;
(b) Conducting an assessment of family functioning and the
safety of the child within the family; and
(c) Establishing and working toward achieving a permanent
placement for the child.
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)